Washington statutes.
RCW 35.76.060

Budgets.

Expenditures for city and town streets shall be budgeted by each city and town according to the same functional categories prescribed by the state auditor for purposes of accounting and reporting as provided in RCW 35.76.020 and 35.76.030.

In the preparation of city and town budgets, including the preparation and filing of budget estimates, adoption of preliminary budgets and adoption of final budgets, all expenditures for street purposes shall be designated by such functional categories only.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.76.060. Prior: 1963 c 115 s 6.]